My coworker brought us here for lunch and we all left satisfied.  Luckily we came before noon on a weekday.  Otherwise, we would've had to wait for a table. Their menu is pretty extensive and the English translations don't really do justice so it's best to go with someone who can read Chinese or is familiar with the Shanghai style dishes.  Our coworker helped to order everything.  For 5 people, we ordered: - Pan Fried Juicy Pork Buns - Steamed Juicy Pork Buns x 2 - Vegetable & Salted Pork Rice - Green Onion Pancake x 2 - Fish Gluten with Bok Choy - Eggplant with Minced Pork My favorites were the Green Onion Pancake and Xiao Long Bao (steamed juicy pork buns).  We did find a dead bug in the bok choy, but since all of us were Asians, we kinda agreed that it happens often especially with bok choy since most places don't wash the stems thoroughly so none of us complained.  Instead, we just stopped eating the bok choy. Service was okay.  Food came out in a decent time.  Will be back again to try other dishes.
Food = 5 stars workers angry bird face =1 star price =5 stars I carry out from shanghai garden many times, food is really good and they give you way too much then you want. however i hope the workers can be happier.
WHY WE CAME HERE: - our previous co-worker introduced us to the pan fried pork soup buns & we were addicted (but we've always taken it to go) - another co-worker & I wanted to take our current co-worker there PHONE/PAYMENT: - the last time we came here we wanted to take it to go & use our card because Yelp said they take card purchases but they told my previous co-worker that it was cash only (WTF?) (if we had known that the first time we took it to go, we would've brought more cash) - before we took our current co-worker there we called ahead to see if there was a minimum to use card & the worker who answered the phone only spoke Mandarin & talked to other workers in the background (without putting us on hold so we heard her whole conversation) asking if they take card & for someone to help her with the customer on the phone - they DO accept Visa & MasterCard but ONLY when you make a purchase of $20 minimum BEFORE BEING SEATED: - just like with any restaurant you tell the host your name & the party size; again she only spoke Mandarin (our co-worker speaks only Cantonese & didn't understand the host) - another waiting customer overheard our co-worker saying she barely understands Mandarin & only speaks & understands Cantonese & she let us know when the host was calling us to seat us because we didn't know we were being called SEATING: - rectangular tables are very cramped & you end up sitting with other small parties right next to you, which it kind of uncomfortable - family style tables are round & HUGE; large parties or small parties with a LOT of food were seated there WHAT WE ORDERED: - Shanghai style chow mein - eggplant in garlic sauce - pan fried pork soup buns DISH SIZING & SATISFACTION: - all dishes are family style but really only feed 2 people well or 3 people sort of - chow mein was with thicker noodles, which I've never seen before but was still tasty - eggplant was super tender & a tad spicy with a minute amount of meat to go with it - pan fried pork soup buns come with 6 buns & if you don't eat it right (starting with a small bite to break the bun, then slurp the soup), the soup can squirt out & burn your skin CUSTOMER SERVICE: - more business, less personable; more on to the next type of thing
Wow it gets very busy and very loud in this place! We arrived at opening but by the time we were probably halfway through our meal I could barely hear the conversation at our table. Noise aside, the food was good but slightly salty. We had the Pan Fried Juicy Pork Buns, Shanghai Noodles, and the Fish Gluten. Portions were generous and came out hot and fast. Service is as expected at any Chinese restaurant.
My mom always said that the best restaurants have a line of people out the door waiting for a table there. This is ironic, since the Yelp community (and people worldwide) seem to enjoy not waiting for a table when they've got food on the mind. Shanghai Garden always has a line of hungry Asians out the door, and the food actually measures up. Pleasant surprise! Came here a few weeks ago with friends for a family-style Chinese dinner, and since we got there just before the dinner rush, we were able to be seated right away. We ordered fried rice, xiao long bao, some vegetables, and a clay pot. Fried rice was delicious, not at all mundane and oily, and the clay pot was as close to authentic clay pot as I'd tasted recently. Loved the variety of ingredients in the clay pot. I wish the xiao long bao could have been soupier, but I guess that's our fault for ordering dim sum at a probably-not-usually-dim-sum place. In the future, I would recommend sticking to the main dinner dishes. This place gets pretty packed and noisy, but if your sole mission is to deposit good, authentic Chinese food into your tummy, I'd recommend this place.
I've always found it difficult to find good Shanghainese food having grown up in a household that only eats it. This place is alright for Shanghainese food given that there aren't very many restaurants around. We got Shanghainese Style Chow Mein which has always been a childhood favorite of mine. The ones at Shanghai Garden were definitely lacking in flavor; the noodles could have been cooked with a lot more soy sauce and they were also severely dunked in grease (which I suppose is to be expected from most Asian restaurants.) However, despite the disappointing noodles, the Tang Chu Xiao Pai Gu were extremely delicious! My mother tells me that the best way to judge a Shanghainese restaurant is to judge it based on how well it cooks those ribs so it was exciting to see that these were delicious. They take awhile to cook so it's probably ideal to get some other dishes so you don't starve while you're waiting, but once they come out, you'll see one on almost every single table in the store. Definitely a very redeeming aspect of the store. Overall, this place isn't too bad. Service is what you expect from a busy Chinese restaurant, but there are definitely better places for Shanghainese food.
We liked the lunch special. My coworker & I always bike there. Super busy during lunch time but we don't mind share table with strangers so the wait isn't a problem for us. I found that take out is another way to go for dinner time. Though they always ask for cash ... can't use credit card there. which is why only 4 stars....the potsticker is my fave, shanghai cabbage rice cake...the bun that most ppl posted here i also like a lot.
This place is located in the strip mall behind the McDonalds, next to the bowling alley.  It gets very crowded.  We arrived early, a little after 5:00pm on a Saturday.  By 5:30 it was fully.  We left around 6:15 and the line was out the door.  The food here is  very good and the portions are a decent size.  We would return again.
Shanghai food is probably my favorite Chinese cuisine out there.  I love anything braised in their soy sauce concoction and I love saucy dishes.  Since most people are used to the more Cantonese style of Chinese food (which I personally don't care for as much), I think it's good to expand your Chinese food pallet to other regions. This place is a good place for Shanghai-nese food, which is good because there aren't very many around.  My family used to go all the way to Milpitas (Shanghai Delight) for Shanghai-nese food but that place changed chefs (I assume) in the past year and the quality of their food went way down. I came here with a group of 7 friends and was really satisfied with our selections.  We ordered the Pan Fried Soup Dumplings,  Braised Pork Belly, Glutinous Fish Ball Soup, Shanghai Style Sweet and Sour Pork RIbs, General Tsao's Tofu, Vegetable Rice (Cai Fan), and Shanghai Noodles.  They were all very tasty with my favorites being the Glutinous Fish Ball Soup, the pork ribs, and the Braised Pork Belly.  I was a little disappointed in the tofu since the sauce wasn't as flavorful nor the tofu as crispy as I'd like but that's okay, everything else was very good.  I don't think any of our selections were weird but just FYI, the Braised Pork Belly has a somewhat large layer of fat but it is REALLY delicious.  If you're looking for a safe dish that will cater to an American pallet the Shanghai Style Sweet and Sour Pork Ribs are crunchy and is sort of like orange chicken.  I didn't look too extensively at the menu since I had never been here before and my friend ordered but I want to see if they have Spicy Boiled Fish Filet with Tofu (Tou Hua Yu Pian) although I think that's more Szechuan.  If they do I am definitely ordering that next time and writing about it. This place was pretty packed on a Saturday evening (around 7:30 PM) and we had to wait about 20 minutes before being seated.  Service is what you would expect from a busy Chinese restaurant so just have low expectations in that regard.
I think the key to having a yummy meal here is knowing what to order. I was fortunate enough to have my first experience here with the guidance of a friend who has eaten here a bajillion times, and also my Shanghai-nese bff who was our judge of "authenticity." This place is reallyyy popular. I was meeting my friends here and I thought I was going to be ~20 mins late, but when I got there, we still had to wait for about 10-15 mins. They DO check to see if you're still around, so wandering off to go do something else is not a good idea. However, after ordering our food, the dishes arrived pretty quickly. First of all, for food, if you're going to eat at a Shanghainese place, you might as well get the vegetable rice (cai fan) as opposed to the regular rice. Trust me. The braised pork knuckles (ti pang) are also fantastic. Really fatty, but also really savory. I am also a fan of fried gluten balls/puffs (mian jin), and even though it sounds really weird to describe it that way in english, they are so yummy. I'm disappointed I forgot to take a picture of the shen jian bao (pan fried mini pork buns), but they are a must, in my opinion. The fried fish pieces covered in seaweed (sorry, that's the best description I could come up with) taste like a combination of corn pops (yea, the cereal) and Hawaiian hurricane popcorn. Luckily, I like both, so I enjoyed the fish. They were the last item to come out for us, which was expected, since they take the longest to prepare, but that's how you know they're fresh! They also are extremely HOT on the inside, so be careful you don't burn your tongue. Try not to let any of the juices leak out because that's the best part. Tip: Take your shen jian bao and put it on top of a soup spoon before you bite into it so the spoon will catch all the juices. And then wait for it to cool unless you want to be making the "omg it's so hot, but so good, but also burning my mouth" face. tl;dr: Good Shanghainese food if you know what to order. Don't expect the best or fastest service here, but the food is definitely worth a try! If you don't get the shen jian bao and ti pang, then why even bother going on Yelp to find out what's good?
I rate for the tasty food only. If you care very much about service and ambiance, take off as many stars as you want, or don't bother trying most authentic Chinese restaurants. There is always Americanized BF Chang somewhere. So many reviewers here wrote about the sheng jian bao , but I think they are just okay. The waitress always tells you upfront that sheng jian bao takes extra long time to prepare, so don't be surprised when you are still waiting for them after you have finished all the other dishes. Xiao long bao  are not as good as those from Shanghai Dumplings on Saratoga-Sunnyvale Rd. The windows outside the restaurant is covered with Chinese writings, other than the name of the restaurant, the rest are menu items highlights, probably the chef's choice. When you don't know what to try, just point to one of these signature dishes. Sometimes, you get pleasant surprise when you are adventurous. I am not Shanghaiese, but the dish names sound authentic to me. Besides, I like the chef's cooking, so does the crowd waiting at the door. So that is good enough for me. One of the dishes I have never heard of before is called yu mian jin  or fish gluten if translated literally. They are puffy fish balls with a unique texture. Based on the Chinese name, I guess it is made of gluten and fish meat. It can be stir fried with veggies or served in a clay pot of soup. We tried both in separate occasions, both were good.  Skip this if you are gluten intolerant. Dinner dishes taste good. They also serve more casual dishes like noodle soup etc. at lunch. They also serve northern style dimsum like soy milk, Chinese donuts etc. at lunch on weekend. We tried those once, they are okay but nothing to write home about. This place is small and crowded. The wait is long. Go early to beat the crowd. The food is good. Portion is big. Don't expect good service though.
I love the food here! Shen jin bao, always a winner.   (pan fried juicy pork dumplings) Fried fish/tofu with seafood and vegetables, always delicious and addicting.  I can't stop eating the fried fish/tofu things! Service = crap.  I truly loathe the service here.  Take-out, it's a 20-30 minute wait, and sometimes, it's less than that (meaning my food is somewhat cold) or it's longer, meaning, I've got some groceries sitting in the sun in the car.   And don't even get me started on their seating issues (limited space, barely any walking/moving area) and their front door--talk about a fire hazard risk.  *shaking my head Prices = not cheap for Chinese food, but then again, it's Shanghainese, so realize that you're paying for their handiwork (read: labor). My in-laws are Shanghainese and they won't make some of these things as it's way too time consuming and/or takes lots of practice to perfect the technique. If you want good food, order it for take out, BUT just make sure to plan to wait for it.  They're terrible at logistics for their food.
Delicious food.  Xiao long bao--juicy. Shen jin bao--crisp and juicy. Beef shank noodle soup (good... Read more 
The Shanghai Chowmein is really good. The food in general is not bad and the prices are relatively fair. I would rate this place higher but this place likes to use MSG. (I'm a little allergic to MSG.) They have the Shanghai Snow Cabbage and Pork rice, which is delicious. All of their portions seem like they're for more than one person so the pricing is really good. I went in with a friend, ordered 3 entrees and the waitress was nice enough to advise us that there would be too much food. TLDR; Food is good. Would be better if they didn't use MSG.
Very disappointing experience. Steamed pork bun can't compare to "My Dumpling" in Milpitas. Pan Fried Pork Bun was nothing near "Shanghai Flavor shop" in Sunnyvale. Worst is fried egg roll, the filling is cold!  When I complained to waiter, he took the 2 left on the plate back in the kitchen.  After 20 minutes, when we were already done with everything else, those two pieces of egg rolls showed up on a smaller plate, they were finally luke warm inside, but it was soggy... Salty rice ball wasn't even as good as the ones you can get from Marina food court. Not to mention nothing tasted authentic.
Service was 2nd to the worst (the worst I experienced was years ago at a DIFFERENT Chinese restaurant AND the waitress even shamelessly asked for a tip - can you believe that?!). One particular waitress was rude and mean. You can tell who she is when you step in the restaurant and watch for a few mins. When it was our turn (4 of us, while 3 were waiting outside due to the extremely small waiting area), we were skipped the table because we didn't get inside quick enough. When we were led to a table, it has only 2 chairs, and they took 2 stools from the back which looked ridiculous and sit uncomfortably. Due to very small table to sit 4 people, and right next to another table of 4, I moved the table a few inches away from the neighboring table, that rude waitress rudely (of course) pushed the table back and offered two options: "eat or wait for the bigger table" - which they don't have for 4 people anyway. Other waiters/waitresses were ok, one Mexican bus boy was being helpful to help box the leftover. But generally speaking there was little service. One of the spoons we got was dirty - it has a piece of vegetable stuck on it. WATCH OUT FOR YOURS. You can tell these servers had no sense of servicing, nor trained for servicing. As for dishes, we were not impressed. Usually long waiting line at dinner time indicates good dishes - this means authenticate Shanghai cuisine, however, we found them to be above average. Maybe we had high expectation before going and we were all from Shanghai. I don't think we will be motivated to go back given the (lack of) service and above average food. There are plenty other authenticate Shanghai restaurants with a bit better service (at least we were not offended by rude attitude). But, generally speaking, don't expect good service in Chinese restaurants. The exception may be P.F. Chang China Bistro which has the best service (but I classify it as an American restaurant serving Chinese food). Good luck!
I get take out from here about once every 2 weeks.  Ever since I've told my friends and family about it, they've been hooked too. The food here is very tasty and reasonably priced.  Very large menu.  Lots of variety. I tend to not enjoy actually eating here too though because it's a small space and there's always a huge wait. Not a lot of ambience or the best service in the world. That's why this place has gotten such bad reviews.  I've never had anyone there be rude to me though.  They're just always very rushed and busy. But the food is really good so I frequently crave and enjoy take out from this place.  I'm even eating leftovers from here as I speak...
Best Shanghai food in the area. Best xiao long bao. Other favorites are hot and sour soup, shanghai stir fry noodle, won ton soup, red bean paste pancake. It's super hot in the restaurant. We always sweat in there. Cheap with AC. We still go because the food is so good. Crowded by 6:30. Be there early.
Officially a family favorite after 3-4 visits. The menu's have pictures of the popular ones. So if you're not sure how to read chinese and the english translation is not clear, just trust the picture. Warnings: -dinner time is crowded, either go early or go later. weekends are super crowded too. -waitress english is poor, so just point and say the number. things you have to try: braised pork shoulder or is it knuckle duck soup pork buns that are steamed then fried (sheng jian bao) puffy yellow things that are made from fish paste, i know it sounds funny but in chinese it's "u mien jing" shanghai rice Any kind of fish, just pick a sauce you like. any kind of tofu, just pick a sauce and the way you like it cooked. (i like the soft kinds that are fried on the outside).
Why is this place only 3 stars? The food here is amazing and they give you really large portions. Sure it's crowded and it's hard to navigate, but honestly the food is completely worth it. If you're looking for authentic Chinese food then this is the place to go. There's a reason why this place is PACKED with Chinese people all the time. Just don't expect to be spoiled... the service will be the same at pretty much every Chinese restaurant.
Found a long wavy dark hair in a dish or dried bean curd, spinach, and mushrooms and pulled it out. When we told the waitress, she told us that no one in the kitchen has hair that long. She actually argued with us!!!! All of the other reviewers were right, the wait staff are ridiculous and know nothing about customer service. At least they removed this dish from our final bill. As for the food, it was meh. I thought that the Shanghai style stir-fried noodles were way too salty and oily (it left an oil slick on my plate), though I liked the chewiness of the noodles. Their xiao long bao (XLB) had soup, but the skins were a bit on the thicker side and the filling tasted artificial and oddly meatless. It was really rubbery in texture. Normally, I love XLB, but this was the oddest filling I've ever had in an XLB. I would definitely NOT order the XLB again. Their rice cake dish was a bit bland, even though it had the typical mustard greens and minced pork. The only dishes I did like were the clay pot clear broth with fatty pork, bai ye, and bamboo shoots, though that was super oily as well. And I also thought that their pea shoots were decent, tender, and cooked well, but also super oily. Their portion sizes are generous, but their service throughout the meal was awful. Our tea pot was never refilled, and they dropped off each dish with a clunk and not a word. Also, when we had leftovers at the end of the meal, I ended up going to the wait station myself to get the take out boxes and bags. They only had two ladies acting as hostess and waitstaff during the whole time. So, bottom line: OILY, OILY, OILY. Oh, and rude service. This restaurant is new, so the interior is still quite nice. However, it is ridiculous how crowded the tables are. The entrance also lacks a proper waiting area with chairs, so it can get quite crowded during peak meal times. When I arrived at 11:45am on a weekday, there were only a few large tables that remained free. When we left at 1pm, the entrance was ridiculously packed, and there were people waiting outside on the sidewalk. Parking is a breeze, but it's because this strip mall is pretty much dead.
I live right by this place and it is always crowded. Every time I walk by I see a line. I usually take that as a good sign, so my friends and I decided to try it. The service was a little slow, but not too bad. As for the food, I got the mapo tofu, which turned out fairly authentic. Definitely better than a lot of other Chinese restaurants I've eaten at, but the tofu still wasn't the explosion of flavor that the real thing is. Also very greasy. Overall a decent place to eat, but nothing special.
We ordered the fried seaweed fish, chongqing chicken, and shen jian bao.  Service was quick and efficient, the food was freshly made, and it's obviously popular with local Chinese people as it was crowded  with them the whole time we were there and the laminated menus were sticky from use.  The seaweed fish was great for what it was - we could really taste the seaweed flavor and the batter was light and crisp, but I found it slightly bland overall and added some sauces to spice it up.  The chongqing chicken was flavored correctly but a little dry.  The shen jian bao was delicious and perfectly made.  I think this place definitely has its strong dishes, and will be back to try their other options.
If you're looking for pleasant ambiance, good service, or personal space, this is definitely not your place. If you want out-of-this-world authentic delicious Chinese food, get ready to raise your voice, deal with the rude waiters, and eat your heart out. Food: Everything we've tried has been good. I rarely say that. So here are the highlights - -Pan fried pork soup dumplings - Grab a spoon, sink your teeth into sweet bread and juicy pork, let the delicious soup dribble on your chin and spill into your spoon. Slurp. Repeat. -Seaweed fried fish - Seaweed in the batter adds an earthy sweet flavor that is ah-mazing. Just eat it. -Vegetable and salted pork rice - Salty goodness. Reminds me of Japanese fried rice you would get at with a bowl of ramen. -Crab meat balls - Giant meatballs packed with flavor. -Ong choy with garlic - My favorite Asian veggies cooked simply and perfectly. Ambiance: There is none. It's crowded. You may have to share a table. Trust me, if you care about good food, it's worth it. Service: Get in, stuff yourself with delicious food, get out. Don't expect to be pampered. As I warned earlier, it's not that kinda place. Line: The line is out of control. If you call a few hours ahead for a big party, they might save you a table. Otherwise, expect to wait at least 20 minutes with hoards of Chinese people.
This place is hit or miss, depending on what you order. Came here with my co-workers for lunch and was warned not to order Shi Zi Tou and San Huang Ji (three yellow chicken, direct translation). so anyways, knowing what not to order, here's what we got: 1. Sheng Jian Bao: highly recommend by the co-worker who took us there and it is indeed pretty good. very juicy. 2. Shanghai style stir fried Nian Gao: this is just ok, I would say lacks flavor just a little bit, but worth eating. 3. Ta Cai veggie with bamboo: this is pretty authentic Shanghainese and it was just ok. surprised that they had it though. 4. Ji Cai Wonton soup: good solid dish, Wonton has good flavor. my co-worker also ordered this lunch special in a bento box, he said the soup wasn't very good and he definitely looked hungry afterward. I would say lunch special isn't that great, just order off the real menu. now, onto the service. One of the servers recognized us from another Shanghainese restaurant we've been to. She was very friendly and said she'll help us order the better dishes next time, I take it as a hint that not all dishes are good. This one bus boys came out with a dish and we witnessed his fingers in the dish, which isn't very sanitary. yuck! It's a typical Chinese restaurant that serve Chinese people, where customers don't care about the service and just want authentic food. you'll get what you need, sooner or later, but you are not going to get pampered. so if you are Chinese, you know what you are getting yourself into and if you are not, you might get a bit of culture shock.
Been to this place twice and find that its quality of food is not bad. Agree with most yelpers in regards to their services but what do you expect from a typical Chinese restaurant. Personally, I think their service had improved slightly and still has plenty room for improvement. In my last trip, at least the waitress was smiling and giving advice on what to order. She really had a pair of eagle eye as she immediately give us the bill immediately after we cleared the last grain of rice of our plates. For that, I gave them a 3 stars instead of 4 stars. a) Should Try Hot plate spicy chicken Xiao long bao Fried fish with seaweed Chef specialty tofu "Mian - jin" ball (Flour meat ball with green) Pork liver sauteed with scallion b) Can do without Veggie soup Nian gao Overall, food quality is good but don't except PF Chang type of service. End of the day, if you want authentic chinese food, go to this place. If you want good service but fusion cooking, go to PF Chang. Reservation is only meant for party of 10 or more. Strongly making reservation as this place is often packed.
Their pan fried soup dumplings are very delicious. They are crispy outside yet juicy inside. I have also tried their "fish tofu". The fish meat is ground up and then deep fried. Unlike fish meatballs, the "fish tofu" has a very light texture, just like tofu but with a lot more flavors. It's a very labor intensive and authentic dish.
This place is the real deal. If you're Americanized, please refrain from ordering here.  You will probably be disappointed.  They don't make Americanized Chinese dishes all that well.  That I'll admit, but they do make Shanghainese dishes very well.  My only complain is that they bring out the food cold at times.  I have no idea why considering I saw 8 cooks in the kitchen. Don't expect too much on service.  Like all good Asian restaurants, service is never good.  I don't know why either.  It is like an ancient equation: good food + decent $ = crappy service.  You know the restaurant can't be that bad when you have to wait all the time for a table. If you're new and don't know much about Chinese food, look at the tables around you.  They usually have all the same stuff.  Order those. You can't really go wrong here.
Authentic Shanghainese cuisines, good pan fried bun or Sheng jian bao, and their fish gluten dish is very good as well (It's also oily, so be warned). This place is super crowded, and the way they cram all the tables here, I'm pretty sure there are plenty of fire code violations.  The nice thing is the table turnaround is still pretty quick. Ignore the 3 star rating here, most of the complaints are services related.  But I have been to many other Chinese restaurants with worse services. This is why I never trust Yelp rating for ethnic restaurants.
There are a few things you need to know about this restaurant if you want to ensure a great dining experience. - The menu is extensive but not everything is amazing. Unless there is something you really crave, stick to the specialty dishes that they do best. (more on this later) - This restaurant is really busy and the line could be long for both lunch and dinner. Table turnaround is quick so just put down your name and wait patiently. Alternatively, come early to beat the crowd. - Order everything together including dessert if possible. Otherwise your order will be at the back of the queue and there might be a bit of a wait. The Shanghainese food here is decent. The chef had made some improvements over the traditional recipes. Not very authentic Shanghainese you may say, but tasty nonetheless. Their chef's specialties are those dishes listed on their glass window. I strongly encourage you to try those on your very first visit. Pan Fried Soup Dumplings (Sheng Jian Bao) Roast Pork (Dan Po Pork) Steamed Soup Dumplings (Xiao Long Bao) Onion Pancake Special Fish Gluten with Seafood Crabmeat Pork Meat Balls Out of those I have tried their Crabmeat Pork Meatballs and Pan Fried Soup Dumplings. Both are indeed very good. The pork meatballs have this amazing soft texture and not overly salty. Definitely one of the best I have had. The crab meat is a bit overkill though. Sheng Jian Bao was excellent. Very flavorful soup and meat filling. I just wish they could make the dough thinner. The other dishes I have tried were not as impressive. Jiao Bai Green Pepper Pork, a stir fried dish, was made too oily. Shanghai Style Radish Cakes were down right terrible. They were big, over fried and tough. The radish filling also had a strange bitterness to it. The sweet rice ball with rice wine was a good dessert, despite being a little too sweet. Am I being too lenient with the rating? Perhaps their pork meatballs and sheng jian bao put me in a very forgiving mood.
Apparently, the name "ShangHai Garden" is not original at all.  This one is good.  Don't get mixed up. Very authentic ShangHai style foods and that's rare.  You can tell by the patronage that Chinese who dig ShangHai foods really endorse this restaurant.  Definitely asked for their best dishes and stay with those traditional ones. What I loved was the fried bao (sheng jian bao).  The other good ones were fish-centered gluten an Dong Po Rou.  (Why wouldn't yelp support Chinese Characters!) Bring a big group with you, like 10 people, and order more dishes to share.
We went here and ordered lunch. We were the only non-Asian people in the place. We were seated quickly, never offered any cutlery, nor given the chance to even ask since they didn't even speak to us except what did we want to eat....didn't ask if we wanted a drink. Good service??? Even our food was just tossed down, as well as our bill. They couldn't even put the right dish in front of the right person. As soon as the food hit the table, the server was GONE. The food came and both lunch dishes had ice cold servings of things we didn't order in the extra spots, and the food felt unevenly heated (microwaved). The rice was old, so was our duck egg. The soup was fine. No one came to ask us how anything was the entire time. When we went to pay, we waited half an hour, while other tables were being bussed. Finally we had to go ask someone. As far as the meat - I should say, what meat? Both dishes we ordered, the kung pao and mongolian chicken, both should have had u know, meat....but all there was were fine pieces of nearly ground up bits in heavy sauce and vegetables. It's sad when an "authentic" restaurant like this serves you less meat than a Panda Express would. Seriously. I can't even comment on the quality since the only large piece we both  had included bits of bone and gristle. Well, I suppose that does speak for the quality. We won't be going back. Obviously, it's not the Chinese food style dishes that they are known for, and that's all we are interested in. Even if they did, the service leaves a lot to be desired.
I'm pretty sure the reason why this place doesn't have that many stars is because of their service. This placed has been packed almost every time I go, it's obviously really tasty shanghainese food, but the service here seriously frustrates the bageezuz out of me.. My family and I came in one weekend for dinner. After eating everything, we wanted to get some dessert. We asked the waitress if there was a dessert menu, and she didn't even understand what we wanted and said "NO FREE DESSERT!" (assuming we're some cheap Asian fcks..) Anyway, we asked for the dessert menu.. which took like 5 min to flag down someone, and when that finally happened the same rude waitress said "You can't order dessert right now." WTF?! Who does that? The people here just want to get you in and out, and disregards any sort of customer service.. Other than the service mishap, the food here is one of the best in the area. The flavors are great, and every dish is really unique. Skip the XLB, get the shen jian bao like what everyone else said. Lunch special is a good price and you get a pretty good amount of food. The only complaint about the food I have is that it's freakin greasy as hell. Other than the greasiness and the non serviceness, this place is bombdiggity.
So this place is extremely crowded, especially on the weekends. My family (5, just parents and siblings) got there at 5 pm, and the place was packed (or reserved). It didn't help that there were no more than 16 regular sized tables max. So you need to reserve for a good amount of people (i think it's like 6-7+, correct me if I'm wrong). They won't take reservations otherwise. So we got there at 5pm and there were open tables, but it they were reserved for a large party at 6. The waitress had a terrible attitude, already accusing us of making a fuss. After a 5 minute hissy fit, she sat us down and told us to finish up by 6 and leave. The food was actually pretty good, but seeing as how we had to rush through the dinner in 45 minutes, I couldn't really enjoy my dinner, and that is a huge factor in chinese restaurants. It was fairly tasty, but seeing as how they are supposed to be "Shanghai", none of the dishes are authentic or local to the Shanghai area. We had to rush the waitress to give us our last few dishes (got our last dish 10 minutes before they wanted us to leave) and at the end, they included a 15% tip within the bill, without saying a word. In all my dining experiences, I've never been imposed a 15% tip for a non-group, sub-par experience. Didn't even give us fruit at the end. I would not recommend this restaurant to anybody.
Great authentic Shanghai place but follow these tips... * On the weekends, get there early like 5pm. 530pm is too late...once you're waiting, it could take a lot longer than the wait time that they quote you. * Know what you want to order before you sit down. * Don't get Americanized dishes like sweet and sour or lemon type entrees... they don't know how to cook these. The chef is from Shanghai, and the place is packed with Shanghainese customers. This place is the real deal and super busy.  Customer service is bad, so to make things easier to yourself:  Great value, 4 dishes can feed 5, about $8-$9 per person, portions are above average.
This is quite a review to write... Pros: Shanghai style vegetable rice cooked in a pot - one of the best I've had.  It doesn't have as much oil as some of the other shanghainese restaurant and the flavor was very good and I love the texture of the rice... it's not like regular rice mixed with veggies and ham, the texture is unique, you will see when you try it.  The portion is VERY generous. Pan fried buns - I've been to shanghai, and the best pan fried bun i've tried in my life is in shanghai, not at the most expensive restaurant we had at Hilton by the river, but at a little store by the market (the street grocery market).  Soup exploded out everywhere when you bite in it.  And I thought I may never had that experience in US... tried different places and here we are, they don't have as much soup as the one I tried in Shanghai but enough to make a difference.  And the bottom is pretty crispy. Special fish gluten with seafood - I don't like fish... but this is one dish I order almost everytime I was there. sweet and sour ribs - This is a dish that sadly, I ordered EVERYTIME I was there... I almost thought I got tired of it but when I got there again, i can't help but order more.  You will see. Cons: The wait is ridiculous.  Come on... 1pm and still lines out the door? Value - Trust me... it's very good value, when you get there and look at the price, you will know.  For such tasty food for that price is just flat out great value. Bon Appetit
Came in here hoping for some fantastic mindblowing ass kicking "juicy pan fried soupy pork dumplings" or Shen Jian Bao (SJB) or Shen Jizzle Baogasm, like the kind at Shanghai Flavor Shop in Sunnyvale ~~~~ @ @ @   ~~~~~ ~                                         ~ {                 O        O                 } {                        o                        } {           \ XXXXXXXXXX /          } {          \ XXXXXXXXX/          } \ ~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~ / "Yo yo it's da SJB and you know me!" but instead ended up being fuming maaaaaad. And no the SJB did not turn into an angry ass pumpkin in October. @@@ @ @ @ @ @ @ ~~~~ @ @ @   ~~~~~ ~               \            /             ~ {                 O        O                 } {                        o                        } {                                                 } {           /XXXXXXXXX\           } \ ~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~ / "Da Shanghai" (aka Big Shanghai, Chinese name of Shanghai Garden) - typical homestyle dishes, Shanghainese classic specialties, fragrant yet inviting people from all over,including regional surrounding dishes. Or so says the takeout menu in Chinese if you believe it. They even have an award plaque from some culinary association from Shanghai (although I wonder how much it costs from a random night market that sells $30 Rolex replicas) The menu is too wide, and part of the problem is the addition of some Sichuan style dishes to confuse people. Pan fried juicy pork buns / Shen Jian Bao seems to be highly recommended by many here, so thought I'd throw in my seven dollarz. Ended up being in the trash. I predict that in a few years, Shen Jian Bao (SJB) will be the next XLB in terms of popularity, only to be followed up by douchebaggery and over analyzing. If David Chang publishes it in his Lucky Peach mag and raves about it being the next best thing after his steamed kobe pork sliders, followed by some authority claiming that authenticity means being true to oneself, it's freakin' over. Sorry food experts, but apparently Xiao Yang even in Shanghai, despite their SJB being really good, is deemed not old style traditional like Luo Chun (apparently the de facto standard from the 30s but supposedly shuttered....leaving only the older generation remembering what the real original flavor is!) because XY's meat filling is not a meatball, and mushy because it is stuffed with soup.....SJB is not supposed to be a pan fried XLB, but due to evolution and demand it strangely ended up being so in some parts. In a way Shanghai Flavor Shop is like that, but at least they do it well. Anyhoo Let's start with cong you bahn mian here at SG, a very simple brothless noodle dish with basically pan fried scallions, soy sauce, and oil, maybe with certain preps contains hsia mi (dried shrimplets) and others containing minced/ground pork bits. Toss that chit like a salad and it is quite a hearty snack. Side of soup is meant to send you home semi, if not full. Sadly this was rather boring rendition that I could have made at home. The one at Shanghai Flavor Shop on the other hand, more flavorful (and calorific). The soup was horribly flavorless, with two unidentifiable objects inside, one with saran wrap around it (inside hot soup!) Thanks SG for the addition of melted wrap in my soup. Took a sip to sample and passed up on it. SJB - where do I begin. This kind is not my style. Yes the meatball is solid and is not bad, but overall very one dimensional and lifeless. The bun is not silky enough like SFS and that roasty toasty bottom that is supposed to taste like Japanese senbei (rice crackers) was absent. Overall just not so good. SFS still reigns supreme...they specialize in that dish and the menu selection is small. SJB here on the other hand, is just another listing on the wide menu. Perhaps there are better things on the menu, but for now the two standard things I sampled are waaaaay better at Shanghai Flavor Shop.
We ordered 3 dishes. 1 was bland, a tofu dish. 1 was burnt, the fried eggplant. 1 was cold, the bok choy. The waitress told us there's no way to cook the bok choy so it's hot without overcooking it. Wtf do I look stupid? Then they said its all cooked in the am for use later and they could microwave it if we wanted -- uh ew? If I wanted leftovers I would have stayed home. Have never had worse service. And no joke, one of the waiters had ridic B.O. that would linger in the air ugh.
Shao Ron Pao - Okay, the wrap was too think Sea bass soup - Great
**4.5 Stars** I've been searching for a good Shanghainese restaurant for years....especially after the nearby Shanghai Family closed and was replaced by the average Bamboo Garden in Mountain View. Well, that search is over.  This place is fantastic.  While I haven't made my way through the extensive menu, I tried enough hits to say it's easily one of the best Shanghainese restaurants in the Bay Area. Everything was fresh, tasty, and authentic.  Yes, you'll probably want to order the sheng jian bao (or pan fried soup dumplings) because that is what they are known for.  But I can assure you (as a non-fan of those dumplings) there are some other dishes that will knock your socks off too. I hear lunch crowds are crazy....fortunately, it's better at dinner, but as this place gets popular (it's close to the popular Venus Cafe) that may change.  Our selection: Fish Gluten w/ Vegetables - fantastic dish that I have not seen anywhere but that was recommended by many.  The fish gluten almost tastes like a tofu skin, but obviously has a fish flavor.  It absorbs a lot of the great sauce and is served over a bed of fresh bok choy. Vegetable Salted Pork Rice - this is a very common Shanghainese dish and they do it well here.  The aroma is fantastic and the salted pork is minced perfectly to mix throughout the rice.  If they cooked it longer, it might get a little more crispy, but that's a minor complaint. Shanghai Pan Fried Soup Dumplings (sheng jian bao) - I opted for these since that's what they are famous for over their xiao long bao.  For me, personally, I'm not a fan of this type of dumpling as I find the skin too thick.  But it's done well here.  It's a bit crispy on the outside and there is definitely soup inside.  Good flavor.  I've seen this served on the streets of Shanghai and it reminded me of the version I've had there.  Next time, I'll try the xiao long bao. Crabmeat Pork Meat Balls - another very common Shanghainese dish that translates into Lion's head meatballs.  They do the regular version one better and add crab meat!  YES.  YES.  YES.  The meat balls were super flavorful, soft, and juicy.  The crab meat just made it better.  One of the best versions I've had in the states and goes so well with the rice. What a great meal.  I had high expectations going here and it hit the mark to satisfy my Shanghainese craving.  Deep down, I felt happy after my meal here (and wasn't thirsty or had a headache afterwards....which is what I always worry about if a meal is SO tasty). Service here by the waitresses can be a little curt, but the non-Chinese wait staff were excellent.  They were the ones that brought us tea, bused our tables, and helped us pack our leftovers.  Raul, one of the bus boys, was particularly good and frankly, made the service better than a typical Chinese hole in the wall. Great meal.  Very happy that few Asian restaurants have hit recently. Shanghai Garden accepts credit cards, but not American Express.
Enjoyable, but nothing incredibly noteworthy... at least for dinner. AMBIANCE: Wow this place must be breaking tons of fire safety codes. The room isn't that large and its stuffed within an inch of its life. Seemed like 80% of people were sharing tables with strangers. SERVICE: The ladies are a bit brusque, but still manage to get things done. The busboys were amazing-- super attentive... they must have had a sixth sense for when teapots needed refilling and plates needed to be cleared. FOOD: - Sheng jian bao: Beware this is uber SOUPY! Very good. Wish it had a crispier bottom (a la the sjb found on the streets of Shanghai). - Sweet and sour spare ribs (tang cu pai gu): Great flavor but mostly dough coating and oil. - Fish gluten w/ seafood + veggies: Fish gluten was too salty. Nothing special about this dish, although it is incredibly popular (practically every single table ordered this dish) - Lion head meatballs with crab: Very fishy smelling. The "crab roe" (orange stuff) sprinkled on top is actually shaved carrots. The meatball is made with crab meat throughout, but despite being quite tender, I didn't enjoy this dish. The meatball was bland... and just a huge ball of meat. - Sauteed large pea sprouts: Very tough. - Vegetable salted pork rice: Good flavor, on the oily side, nothing special. OVERALL: Decent, filling meal, but nothing quite stoodout (the sjb was very close though). Super affordable prices though (tax+tip ~$60 and we had TONS of leftovers), so I'll probably be back. I'd like to try their weekend lunch/northern style dim sum.
I'm usually not a big fan of shanghai food because in general it is always too 1. spicy 2. salty 3. dirty or 4. all of the above. I guess it helps that this place is located in Cupertino where everyone is Taiwanese that the food quality is alot better and just tastes better. Coming here, was a whim that my parents decided last minute and as we drove by we noticed the long line of people outside the restaurant. At first, we were about to turn back and just go to a different restaurant but we decided to share a table with another random family that just happened to want to eat there tonight as well. Just because both our families are pretty friendly we decided to share the tab and just order more dishes to experience more of the restaurant. Every dish we ordered was DELICIOUS. They have an amazing soup (fish blanket or somehting) Their most famous dish is their fried buns which are also amazing. They come in groups of 6. Their "dou miao" vegetables were also well made and very tasty. I am definitely referring friends and coming back but keep in mind that the wait is usually ridiculous and it is extremely packed.
Ah, I don't usually give out 4 stars unless the restaurant is really good, especially Chinese restaurant! This Shanghainese restaurant is tucked inside a little small shopping mall between Homestead and Hollenback.   I  heard one of my friends mentioned this, so I gave it a try. I must say that this is GOOD!  Here is the summary: Taste:  Overall a winner in many dishes that we ordered.  Of course, the Sheng Jien Pau is yummy, and most of the dishes taste good too.  I like the yam rice cake (not too sweet, a good dessert choice). Price:  Price performance is just right.  The portion is right for the price. Service:  A bit rude!  Just like most Chinese restaurants, those servers are not well trained in providing good customer service.  At check out, the server looked at our bill, and her expression looked sour like a cabbage.  Maybe she didn't think 15% is good enough (for lunch time, she even rushed us out the door).  Come on, think of the service that we got, 15% is pretty good!  It is not like we spent two hours talking and drinking wine there, at most just 45 minutes!  Next time, I would just give 10%! Ambiance: Alas, no place for date! Just go and fill your taste bud and tummy...out the door!  You get better ambiance at Starbucks!
I am not going to pretend to be an expert of sheng jian bao.  But, I do think the ones that they serve here are delicious.  I don't care if they are not supposed to have soup inside.  I don't care if the sesame crust isn't crispy like a cracker. I like the soft, juicy buns.  I like to stuff them in my mouth.  (Yes, I just said that.)  The meat is well seasoned.  The broth is very tasty!  And, if you are worried about burning yourself on broth, just make a small little hole and suck until there is no more juice.  (This review is getting dirty.)  5 star buns. The other dishes are not that great.  The Hong Shao pork is good.  But, I have had better.  I like the fact they use a nice big piece of meat covered in skin and fat.  But, it had too much soy and not enough sweet.  Also, the meat was too juicy.  The best Hong Shao is juicy, but firm.  It should be glazed, not sitting in stew.  It was really good.  But, not the best.  4 stars. The fish gluten balls were really nice.  They were light and airy and they are made on site.  Not many places know how to make these things.  Fewer places sell them on their menu.  Yum.  The balls were great.  (Hmm...) and the seafood was fresh. The veggie rice was also nice. The salted pork was great.  I love salty rice.  And, the fat from the pork added a nice aroma to the rice.  It could have been better.  The rice could have been drier.  But, it was really tasty.  (I really overate.) Finally, the xiao long bao was good.  The skins were too soft and soup was running all over the table.  But, they were tasty.  But, the ones in Shanghai are better. With regard to the service and the location, expect your typical Chinese restaurant service.  (You are expected to flag down your own waiter.)  But, this place is super crowded.  Every time, there is a wait.  It is worth it, thankfully.
Three words: poor quality ingredients The 3-star average for this place is generous, in my opinion. I'm somewhat surprised at the Yelp'ers who give this place 4 or more stars. Many people seem to mention the Shanghai dumplings (either the steamed ones or the pan-fried ones). The simple fact is that they're only mediocre -- people who think the dumplings here are good have never had REALLY good ones, especially some of the places in L.A. that can really do it right. To be honest, the skin around the dumpling is too thick (a reflection of how good the chef is.. thinner skin is more difficult to make, and it tastes better because it's less doughy/starchy). The rest of the menu stinks to high heaven. We ordered a simple sauteed lamb entree, which I've had many times before at other places, and it arrived not only spicy, but curried. Completely the wrong way to do it. Another dish, a simple chicken fried rice, was horrible. How can you mess up fried rice, you ask? Try making it way too oily and including pieces of chicken that were pure FAT. In this day and age, where even getting frozen lean chicken breast is simple, that kind of thing is just inexcusable. Further points lost for pushy (even by Asian place standards) customer service, and general way-too-cramped arrangement of tables that reduces the dining experience. Shanghai Garden would really be 1 star, but the decent Shanghai dumplings pushes it up to 2. If you MUST go here, stick with the dumplings.
Their food is not bad but the service SUCKS!! First of all, they won't seat you unless a table matching the number of your party happen to be empty. There are 4 of us. There's a table of 5 that is empty. They won't seat us. Said we have to either wait for table for 4 to free up or use the big table for 10 and share it with somebody else. And when there is finally a table for 4 available, we got seated. It is right against the wall and there is a table for 2 right next to our table. They arrange the space so tight that there is absolutely no way to go pass that table without the diner standing up and let us through. So we had to ask people to stand up when we are being seated, when my son need to go to bathroom and when we have to leave. Ridiculous!! Even more amazing is that when the waitress brings our food, she cannot reach our table either. So she pass the big bowl of hot soup to my husband and tell him, "Well, that's the drawback to sit in these tables. It is very inconvenient so you will have to put the dishes on th table for me." As if it is our fault to sit in a table that is so inconvenient for her!! And it is a bowl of steaming hot soup. My poor husband had to try to handle that, over the other poor diner's head!! If you are looking for somebody rude to serve you, this is definitely the place to go!!
We ordered: lamb soup, house special fish balls, sweet and sour pork, chef chow's tofu. Tofu was quite good. Lamb soup was OK. Fish balls were quite good. Pork was as expected. Overall, pretty good. Not something I'd rave to all my friends about, but I'd certainly come back.
The best restaurant I have eat.
Great place for a quick lunch. Ordered the San jin bao and Vegatable Rice as I was told the san jin bao was better than the Xiao Long Bao. Also was already stuffed with the rice and the bao, no way I could have eaten more (only 2 of us). The only other place I remember with good Shanghai style food is the Shanghai Dumpling place in Millbrae.
Dude, this place is bomb. There's a reason for the massive crowd of hungry folk outside the restaurant. Why this place only has 3 stars - I'm not sure - probably b/c the people who write the reviews are the ones who don't know what to order - and the people who order properly don't know how to write reviews. Figure it out. Staff isn't the most friendly. Definitely seemed overwhelmed by the impatient customers constantly asking how much longer the wait is.  All in all, this place is great. Meal was awesome. Must order: Shien Jian Bao Xiao Long Bao Salted Pork Rice
I'm actually surprised that this place has a 3 star rating. It doesn't matter what you order here - chances are you'll be pleased.  However, this place is known for the Shen Jian Bao, which is a type of steamed/pan-fried dumpling.  They are made a lot larger than the traditional ones I had in Taiwan, but still tasty nonetheless.  The skin is not too thick, and the juices that seep out when you take your first bite are delish! This place opened pretty recently, and has really caught on with the Chinese community.  Lunchtimes, which are when I usually come, are crowded and the line is LONG!  I would really suggest coming no later than opening time, unless you want to end up being one of those people that waits so long that they go on Yelp and give this place a lower rating than it deserves...
Shanghai Garden was a good place to dine after a long day at work. Nothing fancy, nothing outstanding, but good and quick! Their dumplings were fantastic, their chow mien was good, their rice was delicious, and their service was ok. There was a couple dishes we could have done without that consisted of a pork (straight fat) and bacon that was nasty, but a person I was with LOVED it. The beer was good. The atmosphere was nothing to rave about. This place is ok. Would I go back, maybe on someone else's dime, but this is a been there done that type of place!
Again, I grew up in China and had been dining in the actual Shanghai neighborhood allies since I was 9. I know a thing or two about authentic Shanghai food during my many trips to Shanghai. On with the review: The signature Veg Fried Rice is a gem, it is by far the most simple dish there is in traditional Shanghai home cooking but they somehow managed to bring it to Cupertino. A +. The Lion's Head (Meat Balls) are absolutely as authentic as it gets here. Actually I think it taste better because the ingredient we use here has much better quality. The "Sheng Jian Bao" (Pot Stick Style Buns) are absolutely delicious and very close to the ones I had in Shanghai. If you want to try that dish, make sure you are patient since it does take some time to cook it fresh. Not much to say about service since they are swamped due to the fact that they are busy to no end. I am there to enjoy the food so I can careless about the service or the decor. This fits my motto of "Review the food only, don't bitch about the restaurant!". Special Tribute to some one (Initial L.H.) who reviewed this restaurant on 2/3/2012 and give a 1 star rating. The same person who reviewed Shan Restaurant on 9/16/2012 a give 1 star. WARNING: I am about to use some abusive language. If you don't want to read about it, please turn away now! Both restaurants that LH reviewed and give 1 star for the reasons such as setup of the restaurant, how indian food from Shan was TOO spicy for her taste, Shanghai style noodles are too oily and salty for her taste. Rice had to be fluffy and can not come in chunks. MY THOUGHTS? OMFG! Welcome to earth first of all! Do not eat Indian food if it is too spicy for you, Indian food is suppose to be spicy and there should not be a level saying TOO spicy. Shanghai styled noodles should be oily and salty by default. I wouldn't have it any other way as a Chinese. If my noodles are not oily, it will taste like crap. This is not a salad bar and we don't watch what we intake here. Please pickup a head of lettuce on your way-out. Rice comes in all forms and in chunks in the US. Demanding fluffy rice at restaurants like these is like walking into McDonald's and demand them to serve your BigMac and fries on a plate with silver ware. Please proceed to Fluffy Rice R US for fluffy rice In my previous review rebuttal the review of LH I suspected incomplete menstrual cycle. To prove my point I went on to http://tampax.com and use 9/16/2011 as base date, assuming 28 day per cycle and 7 day cycle for my experiment. The result show that the review for this particular restaurant lands on the danger zone for her as well. Shanghai Garden's bad luck! In conclusion: A+++++++ Place for some authentic Shanghai local cuisines. Go try it out. I think the low review stars is due to the fact the food is so different from traditional Cantonese cooking that most people is not use to it. But if you are a norther Chinese food fan. This is the place!
Good shanghai food! But super crowded, esp when we went on a rainy saturday evening. There was barely any waiting room inside the restaurant. When we were seated, my family and I ordered the Shanghai pan fried soup dumplings (soft skin, juicy on the inside), Not quite as good as Yang's Fry Dumpling in Shanghai, but a good substitute in the US. We also got a seafood clay pot, shanghai vegetable fried rice which were all yummy as well as Fatty Pork (Dong Puo Rou). Only thing that took a while to come was the Pan Fried Soup Dumplings, but otherwise a solid shanghainese place!
Not authentic at all! As Shanghainese, I love my native food but this place makes me disappointed. For example, there are too meat in the vege&pork wonton soup and barely can taste the vege and Chinese spinach. My homemade wonton soup is even far more better... And the shen Jian Bao is nothing that can compare to Xiao Yang Shen Jian in Shanghai. The service is not good neither. Anyway, I gave this place a try hoping it would be a good place for my craving Shanghainese food but I don't think I will go back again. By the way, the Shanghai Flavor shop in Sunnyvale is still on the top of my list for going for Shanghai food.
Since my first yelp, there's been more & more authentic Chinese restaurants, Shanghai garden is no exception except it has multiple cuisines for you to choose from. On a Saturday evening (7:30PM), you can expect about 20 minutes of wait.  For a VERY competitive Cupertino area, I think the wait says it all about how good it is. For a 100-seat restaurant, there were 5 waiters plus 2 buspeople, and four cooks in the kitchen.  So the improvement perhaps came as a result of Yelp review, but we thought the service & timing was "near American", LoL There are actually three different food here: American-Chinese, Shanghai, and Sichuan food.  The popularity of Dong-Puo pork was telling, although I can't stomach the view of all that fat.  We ordered a dry-wok spicy chicken, and it was amazing.  Its version of sweet-sour pork rib was top-notch, and a bit unique to Shanghainese cooking for its use of dark vinegar.  We saw several other dishes, mostly Shangainese ways of cooking fish (braised, stir fried, etc.), and they looked fantastic (& were quickly consumed).  My son thought the Shiao-Long-Bao skin was too thick, and alas, the lemon chicken was horrible (OK, so he got what he deserves for ordering that dish... ha ha ha). The hustle bustle atmosphere was also very reminiscent of Taipei and Shanghai, and so if you are home sick, it's great :-)  But it never got out of hands, and the two buspeople were comically "secret agent"-ish, watching every move we made (dropped chopsticks, looking for hot sauce, etc.) VERY helpful! Bottom line: if you have a multi-generational Chinese dinner party with diverse tastes, none of the constituents willing to compromise, Shanghai Garden may be your only choice :-)  It's truly fantastic!
I'll be the first to admit that I'm no expert, but Shanghai Garden may have the best sheng jian bao (pan fried soup dumplings) I've tried in the US. We ordered the following for dinner (in order of awesomeness): - Sheng jian bao; - Dan Po (roast pork); - Xiao long bao (steamed soup dumplings); - Vegetable-pork rice; - Rice cake noodles stir fried with pork; and - Onion pancake. Everything was good. No weak links here. My kids ate up the rice cake noodles and onion pancake. I really liked the vegetable pork rice and roast pork. My only criticism might be that the xlb had slightly thick skins - but none of them leaked, and they still tasted great. No wait for a table of 5 people a little after 6 PM on a week night. The service was quick and responsive - albeit surly at times, but that's not a problem or a surprise. The decor was nicer than other Shanghainese restaurants in the area. I got a wicked case of swivel neck checking out the other tables' food. I want to go back and try the jia cai noodles and lion head meatballs  . . .  oh, and the flaming mini-wok filled with lamb that a few other tables ordered while we were there. (I almost granted 5 Stars but couldn't because we've tried the sheng jian bao in China/Shanghai and my conscience would not forgive me.)
Came here with 3 other people for Sunday lunch. Some dishes were good, but some were just average. It took them awhile to bring us our check, but the waitress was prompt about getting the signed copy back. Right as we were getting up to leave, the waitress told us (in front of everyone) that we are "required" to tip 10%. The thing is, sure we under tipped (by literally 30 cents), but after all this is a typical Chinese restaurant with  not so good service. Besides, tips was never a requirement, so the fact that they asked for more tip was just absolutely ridiculous. Needless to say, we will not be coming back.
Watch out for cockroach! It was a surprise for us to find a cockroach in the noodle soup. What surprised me more was how calm the waitress responded when I called her over. She asked whether I wanted to have same order cooked again or order something else. No single word for apology! Maybe to her, cockroach is just a little extra to the dishes. I asked for the owner or manager, he or she never showed up! go back again? Big NO NO!
Yummy soupy xiao long bao, so juicy. Gets busy,  mostly Chinese customers when I went,  so you know it's authentic.
Just opened a little over a week ago, I think? My mom and I were excited to try the place since that would mean we'd have local xiao long bao. Unfortunately, the food came veryyyy slowly. The xiao long bao was fast, yes. However, the sheng jian bao seemed to take 20+ mins to get to our table even after asking multiple times about it; same goes for the noodles. One of the Chinese waiters seemed to be in a daze or something. The Hispanic workers were polite/nice though. Xiao Long Bao: They were alright. The meat wasn't tough and was loose (which I sort of like, but the mother figure enjoys it "QQ"-y). The soup was good but a few of them had little to none in it... the skin was nice and thin but was sticky. Sheng Jian Bao: The bao was sticky... half of them had a lot of soup but the other half were practically dry! Fresh but seemed unnecessarily oily. Shanghainese Noodles (actual name I can't remember but I took a picture of it): They were a bit oily but I guess that's to be expected. The noodles also seemed a little under-cooked. Food was alright; I've had better at Shanghai Dumplings. Service could be better. Maybe this is all because they just opened... I'll give them a bit of time to get themselves together before I visit again. **UPDATE**: Well, after eating the leftover noodles that we ended up taking home, I proceeded to take the toilet out on a date. Your call on what you want to make of this.
Um, what! Only 3 stars? Ok, I'm really not a food snob but the food here is just good. It's yummy, asian food. Cooked hearty and maybe a bit on the greasy side...sure it's not Shanghai Dumpling King but it's authentic Chinese food. I guess it's because Shanghai Garden is in Cupertino (and there are a lot of MUCH better restaurants)
I'd never seen so many Asians patient enough to wait for Chinese food, but after trying Shanghai Garden, I understand what the fuss is about. We checked-in at 6:30p and weren't seated until about 7:00p. Highly suggest coming earlier to avoid the long wait. That is, unless you want to have the same exciting conversation my parents had about why there were two hair salons adjacent to one another in the shopping mall. In true Chinese style, Shanghai Garden really abused their square footage by cramming as many tables as would fit in their little space. Prepare to eat with your elbows tucked in and people bumping into you as they pass through the narrow walkways. You'll probably end up yelling over the noise too. The menu is incredibly extensive, and we had no trouble finding something for everyone. We ordered sheng jian bao, xiao long bao, stir-fried noodles, kong shing tsai, and a fried tofu meat sauce dish (love my description?). Sheng jian bao come six per order and were fabulous. I found it difficult to share. The tofu dish didn't look like much but was done really well. The tofu squares were firm on the outside but utterly creamy inside. Overall, the food leans a bit on the salty side, but I've got a bland palette as it is. Food came out promptly despite the full house, and service was fine. If I lived closer, I'd be back again without question.
First time here and damn it's crowded.  Fortunately we have a party of 10 so can make a reservation.  If you like Shanghainese food like they make it in Shanghai, this is the place.  We order the set menu which gave us a lot of good food.  Plus we ordered the pan fried dumplings, which were delicious, just as good as Yang's in Shanghai.  The price is very reasonable.
Honestly, it's been a wile since I came. The Sheng Jian Bao is a MUST! It's superb when's hot and juicy. The skin is crispy and the juice from the meat rolls in your mouth with warmth (make sure it's warm, not HOT, otherwise you will burn your mouth). The Songshu Fish was so fishy because they use frozen instead of fresh fish so unless you cannot taste anything with the tomato sauce, I would suggest staying away. All the cold dishes that I have tried were worth trying, with the exception of Yanshu Duck, which was extremely salty. Come on a weekday night if you do NOT wish to stand in line. The place is pretty small, especially the distance between each table so be mindful if you want to have private conversations as it can get super crowded and loud. All in all, the food here is pretty delicious so it's worth a try if you are craving Shanghai Style Food!
A good new find.  Only downside is the wait.  This place gets crowded.  They have a lot of dishes.  Excluding the lunch specials, there are 242 menu items. This place reminded me of homemade.  The Chicken w/Basil had a great taste to it.  The pieces of chicken were cut into bite size pieces, but still had plenty of bone in them.  As I looked at the pieces with shattered bones sticking out, it reminded me of my mom cutting up chicken pieces at home with her big cleaver.  Giving them a big whack to cut throught he bigger bones. Sorry, I digress.  The Shanghai Style Sweet and Sour Pork Ribs were delicious.  I thought the portions were very generous. As a ABC, I struggled a little with the menu.  First the shear volume is overwhelming and the poor organization doesn't help.  Section C is labeled Chicken/Beef/Lamb, but also includes their Pork dishes.  Then all of the Chicken/Beef/Lamb and Pork dishes aren't entirely lumped together in the menu.  A certain element is also lost in the translation. All and all, my family really enjoyed the place.  I did find things to be a bit over salted.  It is typical Chinese. The service is going to be sub par (by western standards).  They do use some modern technology.  After the waiter took our order, he came back to our table with a printed out receipt to make sure he got everything.
only a few dishes are worth the money here. shanghai pan fried buns are actually very good but for that i still would never go back to this place. i SERIOUSLY question the ethics and the cleanness of this restaurant. you may be eating food returned from another customer!!! or you may think you got a fresh dish after you returned food with bugs... but little do you know the owner just took the bugs out and gave you the same plate back!!! get this.... we ordered one of the rice pots. there was a small fly in there. i told the owner. first she denied it by saying, "oh its not a fly. def not a bug. its just some black pepper stuff we put in the soup" i said, "um no there's legs!!!" she looked at it again and said, "well let me see." and then i CANNOT BELIEVE she said this!!!  "oh i mean even if its a bug its not a bug from the vegetable. its okay." i was like, "WHAT? so you do admit its a bug. a bug is a bug!!!!!!!" then i pushed the entire clay pot to her she showed another waitress. the waitress didn't even question and said, "oh nothing to worry we sometimes have small bags flying around. probably fell in the soup". owner "oh yeah i mean its okay" i said, "NO WAY" Finally I think they realized i was NOT going to eat anything out of that clay pot, the owner said "do you want to change it to something else?" I said yes. so i changed to another soup. then the bill comes... she STILL charged me for the soup!!! didn't even offer for ANY compensation!! and get this!!!!!! it was close to 10pm so the employees were going to have dinner. guess what their dinner was... YES IT WAS THE CLAY POT SOUP I RETURNED!!!!!!. ALL of the employees ate that!!!!!!!!!! I returned the soup because there was a bug in it. In fact I had ate from that soup already!!!!!!! this means that ALL the employees ate from MY POT and also the owner just gave the soup with bugs to the employees!!! UNETHICAL! Be careful everyone! ALL of you may be eating food returned by another customer!!!! i am NEVER EVER going back to this restaurant!!!!!!!!!! Not even if you paid me!
The best: - Sheng jian bao - just a little crispy on the outside, soft bun without being too thick, and nice flavorful pork in the middle.  Probably the best I've had in the Bay Area. Very good: - Fish gluten with seafood - these puffy fish flavored balls are really tasty.  It has such an interesting texture that it is a delight to eat.! - Veggie rice with salted pork - very good flavor Our waiter suggested these two dishes and I'm glad we went with his recommendations! Not bad: - Xiao long bao - the skins could have had better texture - they didn't hold up very well.  And, the filling could have had more flavor and soupiness.  I'd order it again but I've had better at other Shanghainese restaurants in the area. We went on a Saturday for lunch and it was pretty crowded and had to wait ~15 min for a table which wasn't too bad.  Service was friendly and  efficient, too (for a Chinese restaurant).  Definitely a place to return to.
Next to my favorite bowling alley in the South Bay +1. Ease of parking +1. Although our lady nice service was a bit on the slow slide with long pauses between courses -1. Food wasn't bad just a bit too oily and salty for my taste -1. Ended up to be about $20 a person after beers, tax, and tip. Not terribly expensive but $20 can usually get you a lot more especially in that neighborhood. I'd go back but I won't be jumping up and down in excitement or anything. If there's a wait, whatever you do, don't go to the Hong Kong place a few doors down. You'd be better off filling up on some nachos and having a pitcher of PBR at Homestead Lanes.
This place is so-so.  However, this would be an incomplete review since I haven't tried the XLB, which is generally a must have at all shanghainese places.  We ordered three dishes:  the rice cake with mustard greens and pork, a soup with winter melon and salty ham, and the pea sprouts.  The dishes were moderately greasy, but that is pretty common with Shanghainese food.  This place is pretty new, so the wait was about 20 minutes (and we arrived at 8:30pm). (+) - The rice cake is probably the freshest that I've had.  I wonder if they make them in house. - plenty of parking (-) - overwhelming menu- there are too many choices - too many tables in a small space.  I always had to get up whenever someone at the table next to me wanted to go somewhere. - My family has been here before (although I wasn't with them) and they said they ordered 3 dishes, but only 2 arrived.  They were frustrated with the services, and figured it was easier just to forget about it. -We ordered a soup.  They failed to bring us bowls, so we asked them.  They then brought us bowls but no serving spoon.   Seems a bit disorganized.
3 of us came for dinner for the first time. We've heard about the food and and lines and decided to try it out. Daughter and I agreed on a 3.5 stars rating. On a Thursday evening at 6:30pm, we were seated right away, there were even a couple of empty tables. The waitress was efficient with decent service, she stopped us when we were ordering too many dishes. We ordered quite a bit, in general, all dishes came out pretty quickly with generous portions and good flavors. Several were a bit too greasy or salty for us. 1. steamed XLB, pretty good, tasty juice and pork filling, I like the fact that it's not too sweet 2. pan fried buns, same filling and juice, crispy bottom, also good 3. Shanghai rice with salted meat and vege, one of the recommended dish by my friends, again good flavor, portion and with fresh vege 4. Shrimp with Tofu, it was OK, ingredients were fresh but too greasy for my liking 5. Don-po pork, a big piece of side pork (Bacon) slow cooked in soy sauce; this must be one of the popular dishes, almost every table had it. The meat was well cooked to a proper softness and fresh tasting sitting on top of bok choy, it was quite good if you can handle fatty meat. Be prepared to see the grease in the bottom of the dish though 6. Stir fried sweet pea greens (doh-miew), fresh ingredient but too salty I know I know, this is a lot for 3 people, we did take home half of the food. We paid $60 including tips, decent value for what we got. We will be back again to try other dishes, perhaps not too frequently as the combination of salt, oil, soy and fatty meats although tasty;  probably should not be indulged too often.
I got here around 5:45 pm friday night so I quickly got a table. the dinner rush started around 6:15. I ordered zong you bing (green onion pancake), tofu with salted egg yolk, shi zi tou (chinese meatball), and fishtail braised in soy sauce. The green onion pancake was crispy on the outside and soft inside and not overly greasy. When I had the first bite of the tofu dish it was super bland. After we added salt and pepper it became much better and I enjoyed the dish. There was tons of oil under the tofu and yolk though, way more than necessary. The chinese meatball came with 4 huge meatballs with veggies underneath. The meat was very tender and the flavor was great. This was my favorite dish. The fishtail was delicious but the sauce was flooding with oil, which I was kind of disgusted by. Too much oil!! When I got home my stomach started feeling sick- the result of the oily dishes since I don't eat out at chinese restaurants too often. I definitely liked the food but I don't know if I'll go back again.
Dishes I loved: XLB: * Skin was just the right texture and consistency.  Was not over cooked or under cooked. * They were so juicy.  Be careful it's hot!  (You're suppose to break the skin and sip the juice out before taking a bite out of it.) Shanghai Style White Cabbage Rice Cake: * Flavor was just right.  They didn't over do it with the sauce. * Texture of the rice cake was firm yet soft.  Loved it! Eel: * Hands down favorite dish. * Hard to find a place that makes this dish. * Hard to find a place that makes this dish taste good. * I custom order it with no pepper and no onions. * Texture and flavor were both perfect.  I could probably order 2 and finish both. Warning: The line gets pretty long.  Let me tell you, it is *rare* for a Chinese restaurant to have a wait like this one.  You can either listen these "interesting" reviews, or you can trust the really ridiculously long line that is always queued up and ready to order from this amazing restaurant, as well as your own pallet.  Also be prepared to share a table if you desperately want to taste these amazing dishes. Try: the XLB and Rice Cake.  Scared of trying the Eel? Don't be, my white friends were reluctant to try it but once they did, they loved it. =)  I'm almost hesitant to share and rate this dish because I want to keep it all for myself!  But alas, it is sad to see all these bad reviews when I personally think this place is hands down the best and my favorite.  So I thought I would review it and give some awesome recommendations Of all the Chinese restaurants in the area, this one comes to mind first when I want to go out and eat.
We've been there quite a few times and the food is quite good. The price is very reasonable as well. It is always packed, so avoid peak time. The service is average level. I will give 4.5/5 if there is such rating.
Came here and managed to beat the dinner rush.  Service wasn't as bad when I was there but the food is maybe a little hit or miss.  The fried fish with seaweed is pretty good as was the spicy egg plant dish.  The winter melon soup and salt water duck were also pretty decent. However, I really didn't feel that the food differentiated much from what you could get at many other places serving Shanghai food.  Service was decent at best but as the place got packed, it sounded like they were getting stressed out and maybe a little annoyed. With so many other well-established choices, I think that Shanghai Garden was lacking in something to help it stand out.
We've always passed by and seen this place's line out the door. We finally decided to check this place out. We were seated right away around 5:40pm on a weekday. We ordered a chicken soup noodle, beef soup noodle, and a shanghai bak choy dish. Food came out pretty fast and the portion was huge. We couldn't even finish half the food and ended up taking most of them home. Food taste okay, nothing impressive. However, we found so many little bugs in the soup noodle, probably from the veggies that weren't cleaned properly. We probably won't be going back for the extra protein in the food.
Came here for a quick dinner before cosmic bowling. Great prices here, food is unfortunately mediocre. Their fried rice is presented in a clay pot bowl but upon eating it it was not cooked in one (no delicious burnt pieces on the bottom) and the rice was completely undercooked. beef noodle soup was ok: good soup base, meat could've been cooked longer and the noodles were cooked too long. We also order the lion head meatballs and they were decent - not too salty. star for their xiao long bao: best thing we ordered, worth a try! (we had 2 orders, yum!) star for service, waiters were attentive and everyone was nice.
What is so special about this place? In all honesty I can't see it meriting 4 stars, much less 5. It's definitely got the whole Chinese restaurant ambience down - crowded entrance, fire-hazard arrangement of tables, clanking and clinking of plates enough to drown out your nearest neighbor, semi-sticky floors and tables, a constant flagging down of waiters to acknowledge you. These are all givens and all perfectly acceptable IF and only IF the plates are good, delicious, and delivered speedily. We ordered a tofu dish, a chow mein, salty dou jiang (soy milk with chinese donut) and the oh-so-famous sheng jian bao (pork buns?). They all came dripping in oil! I mean, I understand that it's not advertised as healthy fare but geez, at least try to hide it better. The food was glistening and not in a good way. It looked like they forgot to cook it with oil and they added it AFTER it was already done. The noodles were undercooked, the tofu decent but much too oily, and the sheng jian bao declined to make an appearance in a timely manner. Needless to say, I won't be back here. Bleh!
Food is so so. So many MSG in the food. Waitress is rude.
Another new Shanghai restaurant in the area!  It was open last week and today's lunch had a full house. Food is fantastic.  Authentic Shanghai-ese.  We ordered pan fried buns (Sheng Jian Bao), SH smoked fish, crab with rice cake, and eels.  Very tasty! Service was typical Chinese service.  Nobody greeted us or showed us the table and we just waited waited waited, until we asked a waitress if we could sit at an empty table at the corner and she said yes.  Without asking, we could have waited forever.  Minus a star there. If you crave for Shanghai food, go check it out!  Looks like the owner couple also owns Shanghai Delight in Milpitas square.  I like that SH restaurant as well.
5 stars for the food.  if you're here to get good chinese food and can overlook customer service, you will find it.  dishes in order of preference: Shanghai style vegetable rice -- 5 stars pan fried soup dumplings -- 4.5 stars (got 2 orders) sweet and sour short ribs -- 4.5 stars Special Fish Gluten with Seafood -- 3 stars  (usually I don't like the gluten things but it was well made) soup -- 3 stars Some tofu skin stuff -- 3 stars Obviously, customer service is not up to American standards.  When we sat down, they actually gave us a TIME LIMIT for eating, which we got a laugh out of.  The solution I am entertaining in my head for poor customer service:  *do not tip*.  They are used to doing customer service China style.  Thus, you should pay them China style, without feeling guilty. Quote from http://www.chinatravel.c... -- "Tipping or gratuities are not common practice in most sectors of Chinese life" People give A&J in Cupertino Square poor reviews because of their customer service and I think it doesn't give them justice because their food is great, so I didn't want to downgrade my review based on customer service.  I think if you have a really bad experience then it's justified, but we just had a waiter who was terse and didn't take much time out to talk to us.  oh and the time limit thing.  Maybe this means she was focused and intense. Unless they are willing to up their customer service from their original China standards, you might as well tip them according to China standards, which is to not tip.  don't know if this will actually work since I wasn't the one paying this time, but I will give it a try next time.  hopefully they are not the type to chase you outside asking for a tip.  =P But do pay for the food because the food is worth the money.
I fell in love today... Seriously though, the Xiao Long Bao.. BOMB.COM. I've never had it so juicy in the bay area before, brings me back memories of the xiao long baos in Hong Kong. I highly recommend this place. We also ordered... ok so basically I don't know any of these in English... but we ordered the Shanghai cho chao (not spelled right), rice with the chunks of pork? and bok choy or something, fried fish shown in a picture, and... some type of chicken... yeah I suck at remembering the names but most of these were shown in the pictures so maybe you'll have that "OH" moment if you're reading this review while looking at the menu.. heh.. heh... anyways! We went around 5, and yeah it's not the best service around, but cmon... no asian place I've ever went to had good service, and this was as good as it gets, tell them what you want and they'll give it to you before you finish your last word... which is sometimes bad, but at least they come back fast so you can correct it right away... Whatever I rarely ever rate on service unless it's absolute shit. But 5 stars for my beloved xiao long baos.
If a restaurant has a waiting list on a weekday, you know you're at the right spot. I would DEFINITELY recommend this place-this was as authentic as you can possibly get to a restaurant in China. The wait staff crammed as many people into the room as possible, it was noisy, but the food-OH, MY GOD, the food. This was my last meal before I went back to college on the east coast, and I think I picked the right spot. The Sheng Jian Bao was beyond amazing. Also they have this rice with vegetable dish, or a noodle dish, which sent me straight to carb-ilicious heaven.
the reviews are probably gonna be all over the place because of the extensive menu and not all the dishes done well.  i'm giving it 5 stars because of the sheng jian bao--pretty much the reason to come here and a difficult dish to find executed properly.  this version is more accurate than shanghai flavor shop though i still enjoy the crisp bottom through and through that they've decided to do over there.  here the baos are pan fried more closely to how they are supposed to be, with softer inside.  lots of juice and flavor, slightly more on the vinegary side. i did happen to try a claypot which didn't have much seafood -- stick to shanghainese dishes.  anyways, come off peak hours for the pan fried soup dumplings.
Promising signs of a good Chinese restaurant:  hordes of people waiting outside way before lunch time, very crowded spaces inside the restaurant to maximize space for patrons, very impatient waiters because they are overwhelmed by the number of customers --- check, check and check for Shanghai Garden -- in essence, one does not come here for ambiance or good service. So why the 4 stars?  While ambiance and service is 2 stars at best, quality of the food is 3-5 stars and value is 5 stars. Over a couple of visits with large groups of people, here are the dishes that we managed to try: (1) Xiao Long Bao - 3.5 stars - juicy, soupy, meat not overly salty - not as delicate as yang sing's (or of course Ding Tai Fung's) but definitely top 10% in the South Bay for me for XLB. (2) Pan fried buns - 5 stars - these pan fried buns are really excellent, crispy, juicy, skin not too thick and filling not too salty.  These reminded me of the ones I ate when I was living in Shanghai - since every table in the restaurant ordered this, that's probably a good sign that others agree as well. (3) Dan dan noodle - 2 stars - I thought this is supposed to be peanut sauce?  It was really spicy - and the meat sauce was slightly greasy as well. (4) Drunken chicken - 3 stars - decent, you can taste the wine but not overly strong (5) Salted duck - 2.5 stars - really too salty, considering it is an appetizer and you eat with without rice. (6) Yang Zhou style bean curd noodles - 5 stars - tender tofu noodle in a nice broth with loads of veggie - I can definitely just eat this alone as a meal (7) Sauteed shrimp - 2.5 stars - very salty and have seen much better versions elsewhere. (8) Salty rice rolls - 3 stars - standard dried shredded pork with fried chinese donut inside - really huge portion (9) Garlic peashoot - 4 stars - tender and fresh but a bit too oily and salty for my taste - high quality vegetable though - (10) Fish Gluten - 4 stars - this is a simple dish but the gluten was very well done - the flavor is great also - not salty (11) Spring Onion Cake - 4 stars - fluffy layers - right amount of crispy and chewiness (12) Sesame ball with yam - 4 stars - these are a different interpretation of the classic sesame ball - they are just better!!  Filling not very sweet with yam as part of the chewy filling In general, a very full meal will run you around $10-$12 per person -- now, that's great value. Definitely my favorite Shanghainese restaurant - can't wait to go back. Final tip - for a big group, definitely make reservation for any hour - otherwise, be prepared for a very long wait.
I visited Shanghai Garden at 6:30pm on a Tuesday. Didn't have much trouble getting a table for 2. The place was at 50% capacity. By 7:00pm, there was a 10 minute wait. This is my first time dining here so I can only comment on the 2 dishes I ordered. The portions are larger than other resturants. We experienced some delay in getting our 1st and 2nd dishes. Seemed the kitchen got backed up as the resturant filled up with customers. Overall, food was okay and I'm looking forward to try more in the weeks to come.
Just OK, 3 stars max. for food, service for this new Shanghai restaurant.  We just went to Shanghai Dumpling in Saratoga last week, so a bit comparison comes in handly.  Same rating for Shanghai Dumpling. XLB  -  6 for $5.95 juicy and flavorful, at least it was serviced with vinegar and ginger, did not get that at SD last week Salty pork, bamboo and tofu skin soup $10.95 big portion but MSG laden, pork is pretty fatty too, SD charged $8.95 for the same item. Sea cucumber in brown sauce - $13.95 pretty flavorful with lot of sea cucumber, black mushroom, bamboo shoots Rice with salty pork with bok choy  $6.95 pretty good House special - seafood and fish paste in gluten $13.95, rip off, not Shanghai dish, never heard of it and taste bland Lion Head in brown sauce - $8.95 4 jumbo pork balls with bok choy, my wife's favorite Chicken with chestnut in clay pot - $8.95 this came with at least 20 pieces of chicken bones for free - an invitation to law suit, I would use boneless pieces if I were the owner.  Otherwise, it taste pretty good. Overall, service is not bad, except for one young gentleman who seems to be pretty upset about something and wearing a frown face.  Clean restroom too. Will consider going back because it is close by.
If you don't speak mandarin, better not come. I have difficult time to order their foods. The food are so oily and salty. Maybe this is called authentic shanghai dishes. Prices are expensive. My friend ordered some kinds of kidney dishes, omg.... It smelt horrible, stink! The shanghai noodles was rip off, $10, even next door Tam's cafe better than them. I came here with my friends, we felt like eating in China. People are so loud, yelling, screaming all the time.
Very mediocre food and I really don't know what the buzz is about. The only merit is probably the portion - they are indeed gigantic. But everything is so loaded with salt and MSG that half way through the meal I am already reaching for another pot of tea. If you don't mind MSG and only cares about portion, do come. The only thing edible here is the shen jian bao. I can find better xiao long bao in Cupertino alone.
GREAT HOMEY FOOD! My favorite is the pan fry soup dumplings. Service and wait sucks during dinner time, but its worth it for the food.
Food and service here is definitely hit or miss.  We had 2 orders of dumplings - one came out cold and the other piping hot.  Lots of dishes are oily and a bit salty and there were definitely lulls between some dishes.  I'd probably give it another try because I really do like Shanghainese food but definitely going to ask for less oily next time.
we came on a weekday and the place was nearly packed.  it mightve been the holiday gatherings but it seemed like a good sign that this place was likeable.  we had a variety of dishes and i thought they were all excellent.  i would come back here again to try more.  i thought their dishes were not too oily compared to others ive had.  also compared to other shanghainese restaurants ive tried, i thought this one was pretty good.
To repeat what everyone else said, the food here is a "hit or miss", only  because it's still very new. The owner and chef came from the Shanghai restaurant located in the Ranch 99 square in Milpitas. The owner sold the place to a new owner, went to Shanghai for two months to seek out new dishes to add to the menu. The service here is still very disorganized. The entire wait staff from Milpitas moved over to Little Shanghai in San Mateo. The entire wait staff at Shanghai garden is brand new. You will not get served your food in any particular order, meaning if you have a large table you will not get your soup first. Case in point, our Shanghai steamed dumpling came out after two main entrees and our pan fried buns arrived last because the demand for these were so great. Also a side note, none of the wait staff here speaks Shanghainese besides the owner and chef. I saw a couple of screw ups in terms of wrong dishes being served versus what was ordered. Also we were served an extra tray of steamed dumplings, which I'm sure belonged to another table. The best dim sum item here hands down (outside of Shanghai) is the pan fried buns. It's hand made and the bottom is crispy. Not as crispy as you would get if you were in Shanghai but crispy (not burnt crisp) versus every other Shanghai restaurant in Nor Cal. Also, the buns contain a thin layer of dough and there is plenty of soup within the dough (like how the Shanghai steamed dumplings are). This is a MUST GET item if you come here. So far I haven't tasted anything better than this outside of Shanghai. This is better than the Shanghai steamed dumplings. You can't compare Shanghai style food to Canton style food, which is the style offered by most bay area Chinese restaurants. The common trend with Shanghai style cooking is using a lot of vinegar and sugar. Fried rice typically has no soy sauce in it. Comparing Shanghai style food to say Dynasty is like comparing Red Delicious apples to Granny Smith apples. We stopped by for lunch on the weekend at 11:30am. By noon the place was full and there were several families waiting outside for a table. We ordered the Fish tail, Shanghai steamed dumplings, Pan Fried buns, fish gluten (tofu puff ball with fish inside), deep fried battered eggplant. The portion size is smaller now versus when the owner ran the business in Milpitas. The food arrives on fancier plates now. The Gluten fish is something I haven't seen at other Shanghai restaurants. Most places serve it with beef inside the gluten balls. A tasty healthy option. (8/10) The fish tail was very salty, not enjoyable, this was a miss but in Milpitas this dish was always a hit. This dish is usually an 8 or 9 depending on the freshness but today this was a 6 out of 10. The deep fried eggplant was good but nothing special. They dressed it up in a lot of panko bread crumbs to make it seem like a lot. (7/10). The Shanghai steamed dumplings is standard. It's good like how it should be for any restaurant that serves Shanghai food. Messing this up is like Italian place messing up meatballs. (8/10). The Shanghai pan fried buns is the bomb. (10/10). This item takes forever to arrive since everyone is ordering it and because they make it fresh in the back, it's gonna take some time. This is not dry like how you would get it at a restaurant that serves dim sum on carts, watch out for the juice that will squirt out and scorch your tongue. If you want better, organized service wait a couple months for them to straighten out. Right now Shanghai Garden is considered the new, popular Shanghai restaurant in Cupertino and surrounding neighborhoods. In terms of overall dish and taste Little Shanghai in San Mateo is better but in terms of newer dishes and the pan fried buns Shanghai Garden wins out.
Like any good Chinese restaurant:  Food is good, service is bad   Get the seaweed fried fish, shanghai thick chow mein, volcano chicken, salt and pepper pork chops, and this soupy dish they make with tofu noodles (don't remember the name).  There's other good dishes, but I can't name them all.  Just know that if other Chinese people are lining up to get in and eat there, it's damn good!
Sheng Jian Bao was good and it's huge! Shanghai Chao Mian was so-so. Yu Mian Jin was my husband's favorite.
Food is good, service sucks. I went to the restaurant by my self at about 4:30, a waitress with short hair just gave me a sick face when I said one for here. I asked if there was any plus coz my phone was out of battery, then she said NO, restaurants didn't have plus, what a liar. Ok, then I changed to go. After taking the order, I looked around and found the kitchen was kind of wet. THEN, I heard she MUMBLE in mandarin : what the heck u r looking. Oh come on, please said that in lower voice. I was upset and mad and stared at her. She quickly walked to the kitchen, and MUMBLE again: only one person for here, peckerhead. How nice. and please mumbled lower when u service other customers, No one wanna hear that stuffs. When I was back to pick up, finally she smiled,I thank you for the good experience ur nice axx xxle. I went to this restaurant sometimes, they used to have another waitress and she had good service. Food is good. don't want to go any more.
Food is okay, which normally would merit it a three star experience in my rating. However, it was overcrowded, too loud, and not really worth the long wait we had before being seated. Whatever they're doing, they're popular, but certainly not efficient about it.
nothing out of the normal shanghainese restaurant. why is it so friggen popular? 7 pm, tuesday night, this place is jam packed, with people waiting outside. some things i wont understand. DO get: - The stir fried rice cakes were good. got the 8 happiness or whatever  its name is.. its the most expensive stir fried rice cake dish -sheng jian bao- i guess these were quite good. they;re big, pretty plump, and juicy. the skin was a bit bready, though. not a personal favorite of mine, but were quite well done. SKIP: - the soup noodles. whatsup with these crappy noodles??? they taste like they were straight from those boxes where they just grab a bunch of white sticks and threw it in there. from what i recollect, shanghainese noodles should be chewier. these were very soft with no chewiness whatsoever. -xiao long bao - nothing out of the ordinary. and about a buck a piece, a real rip off. mine didn't even squirt! that sounds bad. -vegetable rice - well its just vegetable rice. just really oily. - this spicy stir fried chicken with lotus root and potato - first of all, more than half is chili peppers, second, the chicken is cut at an angle that if u are not careful, you will puncture your mouth with the bones. quite a few pieces were like this. and the chicken was overdone. So overall? the stir fried rice cake was good, and sheng jian bao well done. everything else was very, very meh.
I'd give this place 3.5 stars.  I have to say some of the dishes were tasty, some where okay at best.  I would have to say the xiao lao bao is pretty tasty if you can get the juice with it.  I had to witness one really bad explosion from my fellow dining buddy who barely bit into it.   I would have to say the XLB was a bit too  tight for it to burst all over someone.
The food taste really good, but the wait can be long.
We used to go to this place in Milpitas but were very excited when the owners opened a new store in Cupertino. The Sheng Jian Bao are a must order - you'll see that almost every table has one. My mom took me to Shanghai Flavor Shop as "the best sheng jian bao in the bay area" but we both agreed that the ones here are better. The skin is crispy on the outside but it gives away to a softer steamed texture on the inside whereas the Shanghai Flavor Shop ones are just crispy. Additionally a must-order is the "te she yu mian jing" - specialty fish gluten with seafood. The gluten balls soak up sauce and are delicious with umami flavor. Also, they have sweet & sour pork chops that don't use that gross bright red sauce you usually get at chinese restaurants. This place uses the actual vinegar and sugar sauce. Sometimes though, the pieces of pork aren't a bit soft so they're somewhat inconsistent in the fried texture. Still, this is the only kind of sweet & sour anything that I'll eat. Finally, we like the chestnut chicken & the house special tofu (with meat sauce). There are so many go-to dishes that we don't have much room to try anything new when we come here!
We had the following dishes: 1. Yam Cakes- very tasty! 2. Rice Cakes with Veggies and Pork- very tasty! 3. Boiled Fish- very tasty! Little greasy though. 4. Radish Cakes- so so 5. Pastry with Red Bean Paste- so so 6. Onion Bread- so so 7. Xiao Long Bao- so so 8. Pumpkin with Chicken- interesting dish but little greasy though. Very busy place. Seems to be authentic Shanghai food. All dishes came fresh and hot. My favorite were the Yam Cakes, Rice Cakes and Boiled Fish. Has high chair which was nice. Bathroom was very clean. Cons: - Very crowded - even for a weekday evening there was a line. Luckily we got there early so no wait. -  All items were heavy with salt and oil. On some dishes, you don't notice the oil until at the end when the oil is sendimented onto the bottom of the dish. Probably not a place to go every day when you are on a diet or want to eat healthy. Next time I go I will ask for less salt.
This place just opened not long ago and my family & I have already been here way too many times. We love their shanghai dumplings, potstickers and shanghai stir-fry noodles.  Not many places can make the skin of the dumpling just right and be able to retain the juice without it breaking when you pick it up with your chopsticks, but this place is able to do this.  Their potstickers are also terrific because to my surprise, they retain some really delicious juices that burst into your mouth when you bite into it.  Because it takes them a while to steam the dumpling and fry the potsticker, the trick is to order them once you get seated as you contemplate what you want to order for your entrees. We've had a number of their other entrees and their quality varies.  We had a fatty pork dish and a fish belly dish which I don't know the names to and they were pretty good and authentic. However the cumin lamb we ordered was too salty for our taste. Lastly the line could get pretty long if you go there during prime dinner time, but we didn't have to wait for more than 30 minutes each time.
This place gives very good portion of food and perfect for family.  It's reasonable price because of this there is also 15 min wait.  This is expected to go to a good restaurant.  There is one waitress not very friendly but the rest of the staff are ok. I will go there again.
We ordered steamed buns (xlb) , fried buns, home style soup, sweet sour ribs, fried shanghai rice and mushroom chicken.  All of us thought Bamboo Garden's xlb is better and fried buns from Shanghai Flavor are better. The best dish we had today was the mushroom chicken. We will come back for this dish.   If u r in Cupertino and wants xlb and fried buns, this is a good choice. Be prepared to wait in line.
I have been there 4 time in less than 2 month since opening. The first time when we went there, the food quality was very good. We ordered crab meat ball and there were lots of crab meat inside, and other dishes are large enough for us, like . In the following week we tried again and it was good also, but the quality was not as good as first time. Then the following week we went there again and just wanted to try pan fried buns and steam buns, but found they were not good compared with other restaurants, like Shanghai Flavor Shop in Sunnyvale, which is the BEST pan fried buns restaurant as I know till today. After 3 weeks we went there again, the ordered the same food as the first time.  unfortunately, there were almost not any crab meat in the crab meat ball, even through the color is the same, but it was carrots!!! Can you believe just 4 meat ball without crab meat asked for $12.99? Another dish  was only the half size as the first time we ordered!!! I don't like it! Today they replaced crab meat with carrots, (how smart, right!) tomorrow they may replace other ingredients! I strongly DO NOT recommend this restaurants!
I'm Shanghainese and am always on the lookout for good Shanghai food.  After reading all the positive reviews on their pan fried buns (sheng jian bao), I was looking forward to try it.  Unfortunately, my experience was disappointing. Sheng jian bao had the crispy bottom and soupy filling.  But, the skin was not made with the correct amount of yeast...in other words, the skin was too fluffy.  The skin of an authentic Shanghai style sheng jian bao should be a little chewy, elastic, not fluffed. Xiao long bao (steamed dumplings) was a total disappointment.  Two of the six served had broken skin when the waiter put the steamer down on our table.  The skin of the other 4 XLB also broke when we tried to pick them up with our chopsticks.  Just like the skin of SJB, XLB did not have enough elasticity.  In fact, it tasted a little under-cooked. Shanghai thick fried noodles - I ordered it because the table next to us had it and it looked good.  But looks proved to be deceiving.  The noodle was very dry, and not the right consistency. Chef's special tofu - hubby said this was the best dish.  That's really too bad because this is the only non-Shanghai dish we ordered.  Enough said. A final word on service:  it's no good.  I'm used to Chinese service level, but the wait staff here took it down to the service level of mainland China state owned enterprises.  The most courteous one was the busboy, who is Latino.  The Chinese wait staff doesn't make eye contact.  When they serve the dishes, they do something like a walk-by, where they don't stop completely at our table; rather, they slow down to put the dish loudly onto our table, then quickly walk away without looking back. My search for a good Shanghai restaurant in the Bay Area continues...
I came here last Saturday with hubby, after waiting for the waitress for a good 20+minutes (I was ready to get up and leave), we ordered a clay-pot rice (rice+vegetable+salted pork), spicy seafood pot and XLB.  XLB was just ok, black vinegar came with only 2 pieces of finely cut ginger in it (cost of ginger must be on the rise again).  the rice had no taste even though the portion was big, and the "mild" spicy seafood pot had only a few shrimp, imitation crab, a few squid and some flat vermicelli noodles.  Overall, I will not come back again!
This place is over crowded and could violate the fire code. Food is a disgrace to Shanghai food. They just served trash and hope you will eat it. Service is horrible and waitress is very rude.
Very good and authentic Shanghainess food. I've tried almost 30 items on the menu! The fish gluten ball is interesting to try (big order is the special seafood one but for a smaller order u can get the fish gluten ball with green cabbage the soup one isn't very impressive). Braised silver carp in brown sauce is deeeelicious, and carp tofu soup is awesome. Griddle cooked spicy chicken, lamb with brown sauce in hot pot, and sauteed string beans with pork are all pretty good. And yes, best pan fried buns so far hahah. I dont like the wait either but other than that, enjoy!
casual south bay dinner for six...a change from our usual and a visit to shanghai garden...fairly new opening...tsingtao and heineken cheers before ordering...menu not bothering and letting the chinese do the ordering...request for dumplings to start...one order nearly room temperature...other basket tray hotter...thicker and doughy dumpling skin not liking...and, downhill from there....vegetables extremely salty and drowning dead in oil...the sweet glazed heaviest batter and fried meat petrified in the thickest starchiest saucing glaze...noodles just as oily...disappointing $twenty-one total per person...
This place is wicked packed on a Sunday afternoon. So much so I had to share a large table with two other couples. Got a spread of items to see  what they were about. Salted duck Nanking style, cumin lamb, and pan fried soup dumplings. The duck was good, an acquired taste for cold salty, fatty  fowl.  The cumin lamb was ok but had good spice. The real winner was the pan fried soup dumplings. It's worth coming here for those alone as I could have eaten two orders. These were excellent. I saw a variety of things go by but everyone had the dumplings. They are made with some solid skill. I just wish the other items were as good. Service is actually friendly compared to your average surly Chinese joint.  They have tons of dishes, and if the dim sum selection alone is anywhere near as good as those dumplings, it's worth returning. Again it's worth it for those  pan fried soup dumplings alone. 3.5 stars
EWWWWW.... Bad way to start a review, but thats all I can say. When I came here, I had to wait a pretty long time which got my hopes up that this restaurant is going to be very good, but when i sat down to eat wow not great at all.
I read yelp reviews before coming here and a lot of complaints seemed service related. My family discounted my warnings I had read to them when choosing where to eat. Happily they were right as we didn't experience anything but a pleasant and even helpful service staff who recommended spicy chicken, tofu, both were very tasty.  The shanghai vegetable was good, the fried fish a hit with our group, as was the soup dumplings, another creamy fish dish (name I don't recall), and of course the pork buns. The place was packed full on Christmas night, and we never felt rushed once we started to eat. The wait was a stated 25 minutes but seemed a little less. Helpful hint: decide what you want while you wait for your table, and ask the staff for a recommendation if you can't decide. We will go back, I'm confident of that.
4.5 Stars. I'm pretty sure  95% of the people that have been here are never going to write a Yelp review of this place. That is probably why this place just got tainted with a bunch of low reviews from people who are incapable of a fair evaluation. God, that sounds so offensive. Anyway, this place is fantastic and probably the best Shanghainese restaurant in the Bay Area. I mean come one, this place has all the signs of a solid Chinese restaurant: hordes of people lining up at the door (some negotiating their way up to a better place in the queue with the waiter), stressed out and impatient wait staff, ambiance that probably violates fire exit regulations, and authentic delicious food that you go home thinking about. The Shanghainese dumplings are delicious as well as their signature dish, the pan fried soup dumplings; these are a must!  We ordered the vegetable salted pork rice, lemon chicken, fried pork chops, stir fried pea sprouts, and a meat and fishball soup. We had a wonderful meal here.
okay first of all,  yelpers like to comment on how sticky the tables are, how crowded and loud it is, etc etc. i just wanted to point out that this is a CHINESE restaurant. i'm chinese so i know this. yes. we're loud. we're rude. we don't care if you don't have room. go to asia and then talk about not having room. if you're expecting fancy decor and courteous waiters, go to a fusion restaurant. with that said, i walked into shanghai garden with an open mind and high tolerance for shitty service. i tried to judge my experience based solely on the food, because i knew what to expect (or what not to expect) on the service side. everything was fine, until the end of the meal when we were short on one dish. when we asked the waitress where it was, she went back to the register and came back telling us she never wrote it down (even though i saw she did). she was so fervently insistent that we didn't tell her that one order, so we asked her to bring the check over. after a while, she finally came over mumbling in chinese, "oh yeah, never mind, i did write it down. it'll be out soon." I MEAN. i don't mind if you act like you hate your job, if you come by every 5 minutes asking if we're done...i get that. but DO. NOT. FUCK. UP. MY. ORDER. and if you do, DO. NOT. SAY IT'S OUR FAULT  FOR NOT TELLING YOU WHEN WE DID. even so, this place could have gotten away with a pretty high star rating if the food made up for it. but it didnt. the food was just okay. it was on the greasy and salty side, which i guess is expected of chinese cuisine. but UNDER NO CIRCUMSTANCES SHOULD ANYONE ORDER THOSE CHICKEN APPETIZERS. i got the shanghai style chicken and it was more like shanghai style cut up bones and skin. i definitely would not have gotten it if i knew they were going to be so cheap about it. i've had chicken dishes loaded with meat in asia, so i'm slightly embarrassed that asians in america are even more stingy. blah, in a city so populated with chinese people, you would think there was at least one decent chinese restaurant. and so my search for authentic, quality chinese food continues!
This restaurant has got to be one of the dirtiest Chinese restaurants I've ever been to.  They are extremely busy all the time because their food tastes above average, however they have AWFUL service and I strongly question how sanitary their kitchen is.  Their attitude here is to get you the f@#$ out asap so they can make as much money and clear the waiting line quickly as possible. I went in on a busy Thursday night and first off, it takes over 15 minutes to have a waiter come over and take our order.  The idiot female waiter takes our order and about another 15 minutes comes out with a soup noodle dish that we ordered.  The soup was COLD!  The way it tasted, you can tell the soup base is refrigerated ahead of time, along with the noodles, and they dump everything into a bowl and toss it in the microwave.  But wait, there's more!  We complained to the waiter that this dish arrived cold, and she had our 5 individual bowls that had sipped and noodles have been taken a bite out of, and poured all of our soup noodles back into the main dish's bowl.  Initially we thought, this is great because we're going to have a new one made for us.  5 minutes later, the idiot comes back out with that same bowl (you can tell because of the spicy soup lines that remain from when she took it out are the same) and she served the same dish back to us.  Partially eaten and shared by 5 different people, all thrown back into the dish, microwaved, and brought back out to us to enjoy again.  How DISGUSTING and CHEAP is that?!?!?  Does it really cost them that much to make a brand new batch and pull it out from the refrigerator?  I wish there was a way to report them to the Dept of Public Health and Safety. The waiters are really rude and there is no service at this restaurant.  I've been to many hole in the wall Chinese restaurants and am no stranger to this, however this place takes it to another level because once you place your initial order upon being seated, they will stare you down with dirty looks and mentally flip you the bird in their mind because it slows down their ability to get you the f@#$ out of their restaurant asap.  Their mission is to get you in, order, pay, and gtfo asap in order to maximize the owner's revenue per hour. I am never eating at this dirty restaurant again.
5 stars for the food, 0 for the service. Be prepared to be asked by a random waitress to get up and switch tables because a larger party has come in and they need your table, even AFTER your first dishes have just arrived from the kitchen and are sitting on your table. I was shocked because my poor elderly grandma had to hobble across the tiny sardine-packed restaurant with her teacup. The waitress insisted on us leaving our dinnerware/napkins/silverware even though I pointed out I had already used my chopsticks. I hope she changed them for the new "larger" party that sat down, which was just 2 additional people. They stuck us with another family at two tables that were smushed together so that it looked like it seated 8. When we sat down, my mom and I were actually touching shoulders with the family next to us, so I pulled the table out in the hallway a little so we wouldn't be literally up in their faces while we all enjoyed our food. The family next to us waited 1/2 hour for their last dish, which never came despite flagging the waiters down at least 4 times. Also be prepared to be asked by your waitress to leave right when you pay your bill because there is a line outside, despite how good of a tip you leave. Seriously. We gulped down some tea and were out the door. With that said, the Shanghai dishes here are really good. The zazang noodles are great even if they don't have cucumber slices. The noodles are fresh and taste handmade. The rice cake dishes are all really good too - soft and piping hot. I've also gotten Shanghai dumplings here which weren't very good (the pork flavor was way too overpowering and it wasn't soupy). My family and I have tried at least 18 different dishes here and they've all been delicious. Just be prepared to eat with your elbows tucked in, and with the slight chance that your chopsticks may have already been used by the patrons who were asked to move from your table to a smaller one.
my friends and I were going to eat at Venus Tam Cafe but saw new grand opening for Shanghai Garden so we eat instead. it was quite crowded on a friday night but we didn't wait too long to get seated.  I looked around and every tables were ordering DongPo pork.  I haven't have fatty pork for a while so I must ordered it as well. We also ordered dumplings, spicy tofu fish and house special beef. Foods come pretty quickly.  I must said the DongPo pork is excellence here and it just melt in my mouth.  Really yummy.  The rest of other foods were good too.. Nothing really special about them.  So bottom line, you must try their DongPo pork if you come here.
Me and my friend were eating here last night and we ordered the pot sticker , the lamb noodle soup and stir-fry cabbage. The other two dishes were ok, but the meat filling for the post sticker tasted sour, and it was also very very dense. We told the waitress right away , and she took it back . Then there was this other waitress (or owner) who started to say very loudly about how the pot stickers are fine that they've sold so many today and no one complained, what is wrong with us to return the dish. I turned around and look at her and she went on and kept repeating the same thing to us. Obviously it was spoken at a volume meant to be heard by everyone in the restaurant. We were the last table and all the workers in the restaurant were having their dinner too. The other waitresses seem to be embarrassed by her and kept saying thank you to us and smiled at us. This was a terrible experience. The meat filling was spoiled and it also has the discoloration when you've exposed meat to air for too long. The filling was also really dense . Nothing like your ordinary dumpling or pot sticker. I am offended by the way that waitress acted and spoke. I'm also glad that I didn't say anything back to her and just let her vent. It wasn't worth the effort arguing with her. Avoid this place!!! And I will also let all of my friends know to avoid this place and tell them to spread the word!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! AVOID THIS PLACE!
I was excited to come because everyone's been raving about this place and how good it is. The first time i went, there was a massive line, so we didn't wait. We got here before 6pm on a Thursday night and were lucky that there was no wait. The food was great, but not the most amazing Shanghai food i've had. We ordered the four happiness bean curd appetizer and another appetizer that had a different Chinese name than what was actually served. The Chinese name made the dish sound like it was liver/kidney(?) but it was actually very thinly sliced smoked red meat (i think pork). The flavor was pretty good with the Szechuan smoked chili oil, chives and cilantro and not too spicy. The main dish we ordered was the fish in spicy sauce that was very tender and flavorful. It tasted like catfish, but without the muddy flavor you normally get. Since it was Shanghai food, we couldn't not order the Shanghai styled vegetable rice. It has to be the 2nd or 3rd best i've had in the bay area. All in all good, but I think I have to go a couple more times to give it a higher rating. So we'll see.
Worst service ever. After ordering, we waited for over half an hour. The restaurant was not crowded, yet the waitstaff completely ignored us the entire time and only when we inquired about our missing food did they realize they had completely forgotten to put in our order. Instead of working, the waitress just sat behind the counter and slowly ate a banana. They are utterly incompetent. Complete waste of close to an hour.
